Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.285

Higher education personnel service fund.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The higher education personnel service fund is created in the state treasury, to be used by the office of financial management as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and operations required for the administration of the provisions of this chapter and applicable provisions of chapters 41.04 and 41.60 RCW. An amount not to exceed one-half of one percent of the salaries and wages for all positions in the classified service shall be contributed from the operations appropriations of each institution and the state board for community and technical colleges and credited to the higher education personnel service fund as such allotments are approved pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the above limitations, such amount shall be charged against the allotments pro rata, at a rate to be fixed by the director of financial management from time to time, which will provide the office of financial management with funds to meet its anticipated expenditures during the allotment period.

[ 2023 c 435 s 3; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 420; 1998 c 245 s 41; 1993 c 379 s 308.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 435: See note following RCW 43.79.570.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1993 c 379: See notes following RCW 28B.10.029.